Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.420

Ratite identification.

The department may, in consultation with representatives of the ratite industry, develop by rule a system that provides for the identification of individual ratites through the use of microchipping. The department may establish fees for the issuance or reissuance of microchipping numbers sufficient to cover the expenses of the department.

[ 1993 c 105 s 3.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding and purpose—1993 c 105: See note following RCW 16.57.010.